North Carolina statutes. Chapter 6. Liability for Court Costs.
Article 6. Liability of Defendant in Criminal Actions.

§§ 6-45,
6-46.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 269, s. 15.

§ 6-47.
Judgment confessed; bond given to secure fine and costs.

In cases where a court permits a defendant convicted of any criminal offense to give bond or confess judgment, with sureties to secure the fine and costs which may be imposed, the acceptance of such security shall be upon the condition that it shall not operate as a discharge of the original judgment against the defendant nor as a discharge of his person from the custody of the law until the fine and costs are paid.

History.

1879, c. 264; Code, s. 749; 1885, c. 364; Rev., s. 1293; C.S., s. 1269; 1971, c. 269, s. 9.

§ 6-48.
Arrest for nonpayment of fine and costs.

In default of payment of such fine and costs, it is the duty of the court at any subsequent term thereof, on motion of the solicitor of the State, to order a capias to issue to the end that such defendant may be again arrested and held for the fine and costs until discharged according to law.

History.

1879, c. 264; Code, s. 750; 1885, c. 364; Rev., s. 1294; C.S., s. 1270; 1971, c. 269, s. 10.